Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.020

Judgment, motion, and order defined.

A judgment in a special proceeding is the final determination of the rights of the parties therein. The definitions of a motion and an order in a civil action are applicable to similar acts in a special proceeding.

[ 1895 c 65 s 2; RRS s 1000.]